New Jersey, session 222, A1853.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an institution of higher education shall place an automated external defibrillator, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-24), in an unlocked location in each athletic facility and student center with an appropriate identifying sign.  The defibrillator shall be accessible during the normal operating hours of the athletic facility or student center and within reasonable proximity of the institutions athletic fields. b.    The institution of higher education shall ensure that: (1)   at least two staff members who are trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of the defibrillator, in accordance with the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-25), are in the athletic facility or student center during the normal operating hours; and (2)   each defibrillator is tested and maintained according to the manufacturers operational guidelines, and notification is provided to the appropriate first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad, or other appropriate emergency medical services provider regarding the defibrillator, the type acquired, and its location in accordance with section 3 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-25). c.     An institution of higher education and its staff shall, pursuant to the provisions of section 5 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-27), be immune from civil liability in the acquisition and use of a defibrillator pursuant to this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.